California, session 20252026, AB2518.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 769.7 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:769.7. (a) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:(1) “Affordable housing development project” development” means a project for the construction of a new structure, or the modification of an existing structure, if not less than 100 percent of the dwelling units in that structure, other than dwelling units that will be occupied by resident managers, are set aside and reserved for lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code, for not less than 55 years pursuant to a recorded affordability restriction.(2) “Category one project” means a development project that is designed to protect, support, or advance the public health, safety, or welfare of the community, and includes only the following types of development projects.(A) Affordable housing developments.(B) Development of essential services buildings.(C) Development of health facilities.(3) “Category three project” includes the development of any other facility and project type.(4) “Category two project” means the development of a municipal facility or an electric vehicle charger and charging station.(2)(5) “Construction ready” means the phase in an affordablehousing development a project when all critical dependencies, including, but not limited to, all necessary inspections, easements, certifications, billing applications, and permits required to energize, have been completed and the affordable housingdevelopment project site is accessible to SDGE.(3)(6) “Energize” means the act of physically connecting an affordable housing development a project to the electrical distribution grid of SDGE, including the completion of all work necessary to make the energization effective.(7) “Essential services building” has the same meaning as defined in Section 16007 of the Health and Safety Code.(8) “Health facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, but also includes a community clinic, as defined in Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.(4)(9) “SDGE” means San Diego Gas and Electric Company.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, SDGE shall energize an affordable housing development project within 40 business days from the date on which SDGE determines the affordable housing development project to be construction ready. In satisfying the requirements of this subdivision, SDGE shall prioritize the energization of affordable housing development projects over other residential energization projects, if that prioritization does not compromise safety, reliability, or compliance with applicable laws and regulations. The 40-business-day period shall be calculated solely based on periods during which the energization steps are within SDGE’s control. construction-ready projects based on the following timelines:(1) Category one projects, within 40 business days of being deemed construction ready.(2) Category two projects, within 55 business days of being deemed construction ready.(3) Category three projects, within 70 business days of being deemed construction ready.(c) After SDGE determines an affordable housing development a project is construction ready, if an issue specific to the affordable housing development project arises that reasonably prevents SDGE from safely and compliantly completing the energization, as required by subdivision (b), the 40-business-day the period set forth in subdivision (b) shall not apply until the issue has been resolved to the mutual satisfaction of SDGE and the project applicant.(d) Reporting on the energization of affordable housing development projects subject to this section shall be included in SDGE’s biannual energization reporting submitted to the commission.(e) SDGE’s compliance with the requirements of this section is not a violation of Section 453.(f) SDGE’s compliance with this section shall complement, and not conflict with nor supersede, any rule, order, or determination by the commission pursuant to the Powering Up Californians Act (Article 14.5 (commencing with Section 930)).(f)(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.